District of Columbia statutes.
46-202

Findings of Council.

The Council of the District of Columbia finds that:

(1)

Dependent children shall be maintained, as completely as possible, from the resources of their parents, thereby relieving or avoiding, at least in part, the burden borne by the citizens of the District for public welfare programs.

(2)

The existing remedies pertaining to the support of dependent children are to be augmented by the additional remedies mandated or recommended in the Child Support Enforcement Amendments of 1984 (42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.).

(3)

Enactment of this legislation will maximize the potential for children to receive timely, regular, and adequate support from their parents, safeguard the basic rights of all parties, and utilize the resources of the District in the most efficient manner.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-166, § 3, 33 DCR 6710
1981 Ed., § 30-502.